Utah statutes.
70A-1a-204.   Value.

Except as otherwise provided in Chapters 3, Uniform Commercial Code - Negotiable Instruments, 4, Uniform Commercial Code - Bank Deposits and Collections, and 5, Uniform Commercial Code - Letters of Credit, a person gives value for rights if the person acquires them:

(1)  in return for a binding commitment to extend credit or for the extension of immediately available credit, whether or not drawn upon and whether or not a charge-back is provided for in the event of difficulties in collection;

(2)  as security for, or in total or partial satisfaction of, a preexisting claim;

(3)  by accepting delivery under a preexisting contract for purchase; or

(4)  in return for any consideration sufficient to support a simple contract.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 2007 General Session

